Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1197.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 932n. (1) An officer of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard, an officer of any other civil, military, or naval service of the United States, or an officer of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, shall not order to, bring to, or keep at any place where an election is held, including, but not limited to, an election day polling place, an early voting site, an absent voter counting board location, a clerk's office while election activities are being conducted, or a location where election canvassing or election certification activities are occurring, any troops or armed individuals unless such force is necessary to repel armed enemies of the United States. (2) An officer or member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard, an officer or member of any other civil, military, or naval service of the United States, or an officer or any personnel of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, shall not do any of the following: (a) Prescribe or fix, or attempt to prescribe or fix, the qualifications of voters at an election in this state. (b) Prevent or attempt to prevent by force, threat, intimidation, advice, or otherwise any qualified voter of this state from fully exercising that qualified voter's right to vote at an election in this state. (c) Order, compel, or attempt to compel any election official of this state to receive or accept a vote from an individual who is not legally qualified to vote at an election in this state. (d) Impose or attempt to impose any regulations for conducting an election in this state that are different than the regulations for conducting an election in this state as prescribed by law. (e) Interfere in any manner with an election official in the discharge of the election official's duties. (3) This section does not prevent any qualified voter from exercising that qualified voter's right to vote at an election in this state. (4) The attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the proper county may conduct an investigation of an alleged violation of subsection (1) or (2) and bring an action for a violation of subsection (1) or (2). (5) An individual who violates subsection (1) or (2) is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) For a first offense, the individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (b) For a second offense, the individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (c) For a third or subsequent offense, the individual is guilty of a felony. Sec. 932p. (1) An individual aggrieved by a violation of section 932n may enforce section 932n in a civil action. In a civil action under this section, the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees, reasonable expert fees, reasonable litigation expenses, and any other fees that are appropriate as determined by the court. (2) The attorney general may enforce section 932n, and may institute for this state, or in the name of this state, an action for equitable relief, including a request for any of the following: (a) A temporary restraining order. (b) A preliminary or permanent injunction. (c) Any other appropriate order. (3) The remedies provided under this section and section 932n are cumulative and must not be construed as restricting the application of any other law, including, but not limited to, the application of a criminal law to an individual whose conduct violates section 932n.